New Jersey, session 222, S3799.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Attorney General shall establish a public awareness campaign to foster community-wide discussions and promote awareness of the rights established under the Crime Victims Bill of Rights pursuant to P.L.1985, c.249 (C.52:4B-34 et seq.) and the availability of compensation for crime victims provided by the Victims of Crime Compensation Office. b.    The public awareness campaign shall include, but not be limited to:  community outreach; training for appropriate agencies, entities, and organizations; and providing information to the public regarding the services and benefits provided by the Victims of Crime Compensation Office, including information regarding the crimes for which the office may order compensation, the documents required to file a claim with the office, the time requirements for filing a claim, and the specific benefits provided by the office. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.